Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1388
Commission; adopt rules and regulations.

The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the State Employees Collective Bargaining Act.

Laws 1987, LB 661, § 20.